Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3306
Inland port authority; powers.

(1) An inland port authority shall have the power to:

(a) Plan, facilitate, and develop the inland port district in conjunction with the city, the county or counties, and other public and private entities, including the development of publicly owned infrastructure and improvements within the inland port district;

(b) Engage in marketing and business recruitment activities and efforts to encourage and facilitate development of the inland port district;

(c) Apply for and take all other necessary actions for the establishment of a foreign trade zone, as provided under federal law, within the inland port district;

(d) Issue and sell revenue bonds as provided in section 13-3308;

(e) Acquire, own, lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of interest in and to any real property and improvements located thereon, and in any personal property, and construct buildings and other structures necessary to fulfill the purposes of the inland port authority;

(f) Acquire rights-of-way and property of any kind or nature within the inland port district necessary for its purposes by purchase or negotiation;

(g) Enter into lease agreements for real or personal property, either as lessee or lessor;

(h) Sue and be sued in its own name;

(i) Enter into contracts and other instruments necessary, incidental, or convenient to the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, agreements under the Interlocal Cooperation Act with the city, the county or counties, or any other political subdivision of this or any other state;

(j) Borrow money from private lenders, from the state, or from the federal government as may be necessary for the operation and work of the inland port authority;

(k) Accept appropriations, including funds transferred by the Legislature pursuant to section 81-12,146, contributions, gifts, grants, or loans from the United States, the State of Nebraska, political subdivisions, or other public and private agencies, individuals, partnerships, or corporations;

(l) Employ such managerial, engineering, legal, technical, clerical, accounting, advertising, administrative, or other assistance as may be deemed advisable, or to contract with independent contractors for any such assistance;

(m) Adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted, except that such bylaws, rules, and regulations shall not exceed the powers granted to the inland port authority by the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act;

(n) Enter into agreements with private operators or public entities for the joint development, redevelopment, reclamation, and other uses of property within the inland port district;

(o) Own and operate an intermodal facility and other publicly owned infrastructure and improvements within the boundaries of the inland port district;

(p) Establish and charge fees to businesses and customers utilizing the services offered by the inland port authority within the inland port district as required for the proper maintenance, development, operation, and administration of the inland port authority; and

(q) Facilitate partnerships and programs between innovative startup businesses, research institutions, and venture capitalists or financial institutions.

(2) An inland port authority shall neither possess nor exercise the power of eminent domain.

(3) Any inland port authority located within the boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class shall not be eligible to receive any funds transferred by the Legislature pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-12,146 until July 1, 2027.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 6.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.